District of Columbia statutes.
47-2323

Assessments for street paving — Generally.

Assessments in accordance with existing law shall be made for paving and repaving roadways, where such roadways are paved or repaved, with funds derived from the collection of the tax on motor vehicle fuels.

History

Mar. 3, 1926, 44 Stat. 167, ch. 44, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2323.
1973 Ed., § 47-1917.